Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.320

Court to determine sum if consent not given.

If such consent be not given, as provided in RCW 7.52.310, before the report of sale, the court shall ascertain and determine what proportion of the proceeds of the sale, after deducting expenses, will be a just and reasonable sum to be invested for the benefit of the person entitled to such estate for life, or years, and shall order the same to be deposited in court for that purpose.

[Code 1881 s 583; 1877 p 122 s 587; 1869 p 139 s 536; RRS s 869.]